Hawaii statutes.
[§305J-11]
Grounds for refusal to reauthorize, reinstate, or restore and for revocation,
suspension, probation, or denial; condition of authorization or sanctions.
(a) In addition to any other acts or conditions provided by law, the director
may refuse to reauthorize, reinstate or restore, or may deny, revoke, suspend,
or condition in any manner, including but not limited to placement on
probation, any authorization for any one or more of the following acts or
conditions on the part of the institution or applicant:

(1) Failure to meet or maintain the conditions and
requirements necessary to qualify for or maintain an authorization;

(2) Failure to maintain accreditation as required by
this chapter;

(3) Engaging in false, fraudulent, or deceptive
advertising, or making untruthful or improbable statements;

(4) Procuring an authorization, reauthorization, or
certification through fraud, misrepresentation, material omission, or deceit;

(5) Misconduct, incompetence, gross negligence, or
manifest incapacity in the operation of the institution;

(6) Revocation, suspension, deauthorization, or other
disciplinary action by another state or federal agency against an institution
or applicant for any reason provided by this chapter or rules adopted
hereunder;

(7) Criminal conviction, whether by nolo contendere
or otherwise, of a penal crime directly related to the qualifications,
functions, or duties of the institution or applicant in any jurisdiction in
which the institution operates;

(8) Failure to report in writing to the department
any disciplinary decision issued against the institution or the applicant in
another jurisdiction within thirty days of the disciplinary decision;

(9) Failure to report in writing to the department
any change in accreditation status by any accrediting agency;

(10) Failure to demonstrate or maintain a record of
financial integrity; or

(11) Violating any provision of this chapter or rules
adopted hereunder.

(b) It shall be a violation of this chapter
for a private college or university, seminary, or
religious training institution or its agent to:

(1) Make or cause to be made any statement or
representation, oral, written, or visual, in connection with the offering of
educational services if the private college or university, seminary, or
religious training institution or its agent knows or reasonably should have
known the statement or representation to be false, inaccurate, or materially
misleading;

(2) Falsely represent or deceptively conceal,
directly or by implication, through the use of a trade or business name, the
fact that the institution is a private college or university, seminary, or
religious training institution;

(3) Adopt a name, trade name, or trademark that
represents falsely, directly or by implication, the quality, scope, nature,
size, or integrity of the private college or university, seminary, or religious
training institution or its educational services;

(4) Intentionally and materially represent falsely,
directly or by implication, that students who successfully complete a course or
program of instruction may transfer the credits earned to any institution of
higher education;

(5) Intentionally and materially represent falsely,
directly or by implication, in its promotional materials or in any other
manner:

(A) Its size, location, facilities, or
equipment;

(B) The number, educational experience, or
qualifications of its faculty;

(C) The extent or nature of any approval
received from any state agency; or

(D) The extent or nature of any accreditation
received from any accrediting agency, body, or association;

(6) Provide prospective students with testimonials,
endorsements, or other information that has the tendency to mislead or deceive
prospective students or the public regarding its current practices;

(7) Designate or refer to its sales representatives
by titles that imply that the sales representatives have training in academic
counseling or advising if they do not; and

(8) Represent, directly or by implication, that it is
authorized by the State or approved or accredited by an accrediting agency or
body when it has not been authorized, approved, or accredited.

(c)
Any private college or university, seminary, or
religious training institution or its agent that violates this chapter
may be subject to one or more of the following sanctions:

(1) A fine equal to a sum of not less than $500 or
more than $10,000 for each violation. The penalties provided in this
subsection are cumulative to the remedies or penalties available under all
other laws of this State. Each day that a violation occurs shall be considered
a separate violation;

(2) An order directing corrective action on the part
of the institution;

(3) An order of restitution to one or more affected
students;

(4) Revocation, suspension, probation, or conditions
on the institution's authorization;

(5) An order relating to cessation of operations or
alternate enrollment; or

(6) The payment of costs of investigation and legal
action, irrespective of the outcome. [L 2013, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next